nb: Pastinakkvariant: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; Hollow Crown; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; Annet
pl: Odmiana pasternaku: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; Hollow Crown; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; Inne
nl: Pastinaak variëteit: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; Hollow Crown; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; Overig
tr: Yaban havucu çeşidi: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; Hollow Crown; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; Diğer
ru: Сорт пастернака: Альбион; Андовер; Кобхэм улучшенный; Гладиатор; Хальбланге; Холлоу Краун; Джавелин; Турга; Уайт Джем; Другое
sv: Palsternackasort: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; Hollow Crown; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; Övrigt
th: พันธุ์พาร์สนิป: อัลเบียน; แอนโดเวอร์; คอบแฮม อิมพรูฟ; กลาดิเอเตอร์; ฮาลบลังเงอ; ฮอลโลว์คราวน์; จาเวลิน; ทูร์กา; ไวท์เจม; อื่นๆ
cs: Odrůda pastináku: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; Hollow Crown; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; Jiné
sl-SI: Sorta pastinaka: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; Hollow Crown; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; Drugo
en: Parsnip variety: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; Hollow Crown; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; Other
pt-PT: Variedade de pastinaca: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; Hollow Crown; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; Outro
da: Pastinaksort: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; Hollow Crown; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; Anden
hu: Paszternákfajta: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; Hollow Crown; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; Egyéb
it: Varietà di pastinaca: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; Hollow Crown; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; Altro
pt-BR: Variedade de pastinaca: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; Hollow Crown; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; Outro
bg-BG: Сорт пащърнак: Албион; Андоувър; Кобъм импрувд; Гладиатор; Халбланге; Холоу краун; Джавелин; Турга; Уайт джем; Друго
vi: Giống củ cải vàng: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; Hollow Crown; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; Khác
el: Ποικιλία παστινάκι: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; Hollow Crown; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; Άλλο
ko: 파스닙 품종: 알비온; 앤도버; 코밤 임프루브드; 글래디에이터; 할블랑제; 할로우 크라운; 자벨린; 투르가; 화이트 젬; 기타
lt-LT: Pastarnoko veislė: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; Hollow Crown; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; Kita
zh-TW: 歐防風品種: 阿爾比恩; 安多弗; 改良型科巴姆; 角鬥士; 哈布蘭日; 空心冠; 標槍; 圖爾加; 白寶石; 其他
ja: パースニップの種類: アルビオン; アンドーバー; コブハムインプルーブド; グラディエーター; ハルブランゲ; ホロウクラウン; ジャベリン; トゥルガ; ホワイトジェム; その他
sk-SK: Odroda paštrnáka: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; Hollow Crown; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; Iné
fi: Palsternakan lajike: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; Hollow Crown; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; Muu
hr-HR: Sorta pastrnjaka: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; Hollow Crown; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; Ostalo
de: Pastinakensorte: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; Hollow Crown; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; Sonstige
zh-CN: 欧洲防风草品种: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; Hollow Crown; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; 其他
es: Variedad de chirivías: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; Hollow Crown; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; Otro
ro-RO: Soi de păstârnac: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; Hollow Crown; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; Altele
fr: Variété de panais: Albion; Andover; Cobham Improved; Gladiator; Halblange; À collet creux; Javelin; Turga; White Gem; Autre